Georgia statutes. TITLE 38 Military, Emergency Management, and Veterans Affairs
Article 1 General Provisions

Law reviews.

For article, “Is Georgia Prepared for a Health Pandemic? Legal Issues Regarding Emergency Preparedness and Declaration of Emergency Health Pandemic in Georgia,”
see 15 (No. 6) Ga. St. B.J. 30 (2010).

38-3-1.
Short title.

Articles 1 through 3 of this chapter may be cited as the “Georgia Emergency Management Act of 1981.”

History.

Ga. L. 1951, p. 224, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 38.

Cross references.

Georgia Antiterroristic Training Act, T. 16, C. 11, A. 4, P. 4.

38-3-2.
Policy and purpose.

Because of the existing and increasing possibility of the occurrence of emergencies or disasters resulting from manmade or natural causes or enemy attack; in order to ensure that preparations of this state will be adequate to deal with such emergencies or disasters; generally to provide for the common defense and to protect the public peace, health, and safety; and to preserve the lives and property of the people of this state, it is found and declared to be necessary:

To create a state emergency management agency and to authorize the creation of local organizations for emergency management in the political subdivisions of the state;

To confer upon the Governor and upon the executive heads of governing bodies of the political subdivisions of the state the emergency powers provided in Articles 1 through 3 of this chapter;

To provide for the rendering of mutual aid among the political subdivisions of the state, with other states, and with the federal government with respect to the carrying out of emergency management functions; and

To authorize the establishment of such organizations and the taking of such steps as are necessary and appropriate to carry out Articles 1 through 3 of this chapter.

It is further declared to be the purpose of Articles 1 through 3 of this chapter and the policy of this state that all emergency management functions of this state be coordinated to the maximum extent with the comparable functions of the federal government, including its various departments and agencies; of other states and localities; and of private agencies of every type, to the end that the most effective preparation and use may be made of the nation’s manpower, resources, and facilities for dealing with any emergency or disaster that may occur.

History.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 224, § 2; Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 171, § 1; Ga. L. 1973, p. 74, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 389, § 2.

Law reviews.

For article, “Mandatory Quarantine:
Administrative order by the Georgia Department of Public Health for Public Health Control Measures:
Isolation Protocol,” see 37 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 81 (2020).

38-3-3.
Definitions.

As used in Articles 1 through 3 of this chapter, the term:

“Bioterrorism” means the intentional creation or use of any microorganism, virus, infectious substance, or any component thereof, whether naturally occurring or bioengineered, to cause death, illness, disease, or other biological malfunction in a human, animal, plant, or other living organism in order improperly or illegally to influence the conduct of government, to interfere with or disrupt commerce, or to intimidate or coerce a civilian population.

“Emergency management” means the preparation for the carrying out of all emergency functions other than functions for which military forces are primarily responsible to prevent, minimize, and repair injury and damage resulting from emergencies, energy emergencies, disasters, or the imminent threat thereof, of manmade or natural origin caused by enemy attack, sabotage, acts of domestic or international terrorism, civil disturbance, fire, flood, earthquake, wind, storm, wave action, oil spill or other water contamination requiring emergency action to avert danger or damage, epidemic, air contamination, blight, drought, infestation, explosion, riot or other hostile action, radiological action, or other causes. These functions include, without limitation, fire-fighting services; police services; emergency medical services; rescue; engineering; warning services; communications; defense from radiological, chemical, biological, and other special weapons to include weapons of mass destruction; evacuation of persons from stricken areas; emergency welfare services; consequence management functions to include victim services; emergency transportation; plant protection; temporary restoration of public utility services; and other functions related to civilian protection, together with all other activities necessary or incidental to the preparation for and carrying out of the foregoing functions.

(2.1)

“Emergency Operations Command” means the unified command group comprising the director of emergency management and homeland security, the director of the Georgia Bureau of Investigation, the commissioner of public safety, the commissioner of natural resources, the commissioner of transportation, and the adjutant general.

“Energy emergency” means a condition of danger to the health, safety, welfare, or economic well-being of the citizens of this state arising out of a present or threatened shortage of usable energy resources; also any condition of substantial danger to the health, safety, or welfare of the citizens of this state resulting from the operation of any electrical power-generating facility, the transport of any energy resource by any means whatsoever, or the production, use, or disposal of any source material, special nuclear material, or by-product, as defined by the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, 68 Stat. 919, 42 U.S.C. Section 2011, et seq.; also any nuclear incident, as defined by the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, occurring within or outside this state, substantially affecting the health, safety, or welfare of the citizens of this state.

“Energy resources” means all forms of energy or power, including, without limitation, oil, gasoline, and other petroleum products; natural or synthetic gas; electricity in all forms and from all sources; and other fuels of any description, except wood.

(4.1)

“Homeland security activity” shall have the same meaning as provided for in Code Section 35-3-200.

(4.2)

“Pandemic influenza emergency” means the declaration by the World Health Organization of at least a Phase 5 Pandemic Alert for influenza occurring in the United States or the State of Georgia or the declaration by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention of at least a Category 2 Pandemic Severity Index for influenza occurring in the United States or the State of Georgia.

“Political subdivision” means:

Cities having a population of over 1,000;

Cities having a population of less than 1,000 in which the Governor has established a local organization; and

Counties.

“Public health emergency” means the occurrence or imminent threat of an illness or health condition that is reasonably believed to be caused by bioterrorism or the appearance of a novel or previously controlled or eradicated infectious agent or biological toxin and poses a high probability of any of the following harms:

A large number of deaths in the affected population;

A large number of serious or long-term disabilities in the affected population; or

Widespread exposure to an infectious or toxic agent that poses a significant risk of substantial future harm to a large number of people in the affected population.

“State of emergency” means the condition declared by the Governor when, in his or her judgment, the threat or actual occurrence of a disaster, emergency, or energy emergency in any part of the state is of sufficient severity and magnitude to warrant extraordinary assistance by the state to supplement the efforts and available resources of the several localities and relief organizations in preventing or alleviating the damage, loss, hardship, or suffering threatened or caused thereby.

History.

Ga. L. 1951, p. 224, § 3; Ga. L. 1973, p. 74, §§ 2, 6; Ga. L. 1977, p. 192, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 389, § 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 38; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 38; Ga. L. 1999, p. 372, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1386, § 11; Ga. L. 2009, p. 184, § 3/HB 217; Ga. L. 2012, p. 775, § 38/HB 942; Ga. L. 2018, p. 681, § 1-1/HB 779; Ga. L. 2019, p. 1056, § 38/SB 52.

The 2019 amendment,

effective May 12, 2019, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised punctuation in paragraph (4).

Law reviews.

For article, “Mandatory Quarantine:
Administrative order by the Georgia Department of Public Health for Public Health Control Measures:
Isolation Protocol,” see 37 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 81 (2020).

For article, “Forced Business Closures:
Executive Orders by the Governor Closing Private Businesses,” see 37 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 111 (2020).

For article, “Public Health State of Emergency: Executive Order by the Governor Declaring a Public Health State of Emergency,” see 37 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 17 (2020).

For note on the 2002 amendment of this Code section, see 19 Georgia. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2002).

38-3-4.
Enforcement.

The law enforcement authorities of the state and of the political subdivisions thereof shall enforce the orders, rules, and regulations issued pursuant to Articles 1 through 3 of this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1951, p. 224, § 16.

38-3-5.
Injunction; who may obtain; remedy at law irrelevant.

The director of emergency management or any person, corporation, firm, or association, in addition to the remedies set forth in Articles 1 through 3 of this chapter, may obtain from a court of competent jurisdiction an injunction to restrain violation of the provisions of Articles 1 through 3 of this chapter. The grant of an injunction is authorized notwithstanding the availability of adequate remedies at law.

History.

Ga. L. 1974, p. 558, § 3.

38-3-6.
Liberality of construction.

Articles 1 through 3 of this chapter shall be construed liberally in order to effectuate their purposes.

History.

Ga. L. 1951, p. 224, § 22.

38-3-7.
Penalty for violation.

Any person who violates any provision of Articles 1 through 3 of this chapter or any rule, order, or regulation made pursuant to Articles 1 through 3 of this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1951, p. 224, § 21.

Editor’s notes.

For application of this statute in 2020 and 2021, see Executive Orders 04.20.20.01, 09.15.20.01, and 05.28.21.02.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 and 2021 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders.

Law reviews.

For article, “Shelter in Place:
Executive Order by the Governor to Ensure a Safe & Healthy Georgia:
Statewide Shelter in Place,” see 37 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 67 (2020).